Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 30

State Inmate Industries and Labor

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1933, No. 30, § 37, provided, in part, that laws not inconsistent with, or specifically repealed by, Acts 1933, No. 30 should apply to the Board of Penal Institutions.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 44, provided, in part, that all laws relating to the State Penitentiary which were not specifically repealed by, or in conflict with, Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50 would apply to the Department of Correction.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References. Inmate welfare funds, §12-29-107.

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 361, § 4: Mar. 10, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the exchange of materials, goods, and products between the Department of Correction in this state and correctional institutions of other states and of the federal government would be of benefit to the correctional program of this state and would provide opportunities for obtaining the processing of raw materials and for the obtaining of goods and products produced by correctional institutions of other states or of federal correctional institutions, in exchange for goods or products produced in the correctional program of this state, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to enable the Board of Correction to enter into such contracts and agreements and thereby obtain the benefit of this program for the correctional system of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 108, § 5: Feb. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act is immediately necessary to allow the Board of Correction to enter into contracts with other states and the federal government for the buying and selling of commodities thereby creating additional revenues which are severely needed by that department. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 118, § 3: Feb. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present law the sale of Department of Correction handicraft products is much too restrictive; that this act expands the market for such product which in turn provides more money which will be put into the Inmate Welfare Fund. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 5: Nov. 16, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Correction is in immediate need of additional revenues for its Industry Program; this Act will assist the Department in generating additional revenues for their Industry Program; and that this Act should go into effect immediately in order to grant the Department of Correction the necessary authority to generate additional revenues for its Industry Program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-30-101. Bartering products of institutions.

In the passage of this section, the General Assembly is cognizant of the diversity of agricultural, livestock, processing, manufacturing, fabricating, and production resources of penal and correctional institutions in this state, in other states, and of the federal government.

It is recognized that each of the correctional institutions may carry on a program of production, industries, manufacturing, and processing essential to its own needs and requirements, and that in a number of instances the institutions could share, through trade and barter agreements, their production, materials, and goods for the mutual benefit and advantage of their respective institutions.

It is the intent of this section to enable the Board of Corrections of this state to enter into agreements with the managing boards or commissions of correctional institutions of other states, or with appropriate federal officials having custody or control of federal correctional institutions, for the exchange of raw materials, goods, and products in accordance with terms and agreements which the respective institutions find to be advantageous and of benefit to their respective institutions and programs.

The board, with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to enter into contracts, compacts, or agreements with the appropriate governing officials of correctional institutions of other states or of the federal government for the trading or bartering of raw materials, goods, and products produced by and belonging to their respective institutions.

This may be done in accordance with the terms and conditions the board and the governing officials of correctional institutions of other states or of the federal government may deem advantageous and appropriate for their respective institutions and programs.

The agreements may include matters such as the exchange of raw materials for finished products produced in correctional institutions or the processing of raw materials into finished products in exchange for a portion of the raw materials processed.

Copies of all such agreements, compacts, or contracts entered into with correctional institutions of other states or with the federal government, as authorized in this section, shall be filed with the Auditor of State and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

A complete set of books and records shall be kept with respect to all transactions, deliveries, and obligations under each compact, contract, or agreement. Copies shall be filed with the Auditor of State and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and shall be available to public inspection during all normal business hours.

The board may make reasonable rules governing the Division of Correction in the administration of contracts, compacts, or agreements made under the provisions of this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (g).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (e).

Acquisition of necessary machinery, materials, and equipment;

Establishment of procedures for public sale of inmate-produced craft;

Inmate eligibility for participation in the workcraft program; and

Establishment of a workcraft program revolving fund.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “rules and regulations” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (a)(1).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 825, § 3: Apr. 4, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that inmate produced goods could be readily sold to nonprofit organizations thereby producing a source of revenue which is badly needed to help fund the Arkansas prison system; that this act would authorize such a procedure. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 944, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 361, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-250, 46-250n; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 903; 2019, No. 910, §
812.

12-30-102. Buying and selling products of institutions.

The Board of Corrections is authorized to enter into contracts, compacts, or agreements with the appropriate governing officials of agencies of other states or of the federal government for the buying and selling of raw materials, goods, and products produced by and belonging to their respective institutions in accordance with such terms and conditions as the board and the governing officials of correctional institutions of other states or the federal government may deem advantageous and appropriate for their respective institutions and programs.

These agreements may include matters such as the buying and selling of raw materials for finished products produced in correctional institutions or for the processing of materials into finished products.

Copies of all such agreements, compacts, or contracts entered into with correctional institutions of other states, or with the federal government as authorized in this section, shall be filed with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

(1)A complete set of books and records shall be kept with respect to all transactions, deliveries, and obligations under each compact, contract, or agreement.

Copies shall be filed with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and shall be available to public inspection during all normal business hours.

The board may make reasonable rules governing the Division of Correction in the administration of contracts, compacts, or agreements made under the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 108, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-251 — 46-253; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 904; 2019, No. 910, §
813.

12-30-103. Workcraft program.

The Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction are authorized to operate a workcraft program that offers instruction and training for their inmates, thereby helping prepare them for employment after incarceration.

The Board of Corrections is authorized to establish rules for operating the workcraft program, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

History.

Acts 1975, No. 702, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-248; Acts 1995, No. 205, § 1; 1995, No. 292, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 905; 2019, No. 910, §
814.

12-30-104. Sale of workcraft items.

(1)The sale of items produced in the Division of Correction or the Division of Correction workcraft programs may be through one (1) or more retail outlets operated by the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.

The public availability of these items for sale will be made known through advertising or other public marketing communications, or both.

(1)Prices of workcraft items shall be sufficient to cover production cost.

A percentage of sale proceeds, as determined by rule, will accrue to the individual product-creating inmate's account and the remainder to a workcraft program revolving fund.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 702, § 2; 1981, No. 118, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-249; Acts 1995, No. 205, § 2; 1995, No. 292, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 906; 2019, No. 910, §
815.

12-30-105. Marketing contracts.

(1)The Division of Correction may enter into marketing contracts with dealers, retailers, distributors, and manufacturer representatives permitting them to market and sell all products and services produced by the Division of Correction industry program in accordance with existing laws and state purchasing rules.

The Industry Division of theDivision of Correction will be responsible for all billing of purchased products and services to ensure that only customers authorized by law are making said purchases.

Reimbursement to companies on contract for marketing of said products and services will be based on rules established by the Board of Corrections.

History.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 48, §§ 1, 2; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 907; 2019, No. 910, §
816.

Subchapter 2

— Prison-Made Goods Act of 1967

12-30-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Prison-Made Goods Act of 1967”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-235.

12-30-202. Legislative intent.

Whereas, the means now provided for the employment of prison labor are inadequate to furnish a sufficient number of prisoners with diversified employment, it is declared to be the intent of this subchapter:

To further provide more adequate, regular, and suitable employment for the prisoners of this state, consistent with proper penal purposes;

To further utilize the labor of prisoners for self-maintenance and for reimbursing this state for expenses incurred by reason of their crimes and imprisonment; and

To effect the requisitioning and disbursement of prison products directly through established state authorities with no possibility of private profits therefrom.

Cited: Wells v. Heath, 274 Ark. 45, 622 S.W.2d 163 (1981).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-234.

12-30-203. Establishment of prison industries.

The Board of Corrections may purchase, in the manner provided by law, equipment, raw materials, and supplies and engage supervisory personnel necessary to establish and maintain for this state, at the Division of Correction or institution under control of the board, industries for the utilization of services of prisoners in the manufacture or production of articles or products as may be needed for the construction, operation, maintenance, or use of any office, department, division, institution, or agency supported, in whole or in part, by this state and the political subdivisions of this state.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-236; 2013, No. 1277, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 817.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “may purchase” for “is authorized to purchase”; deleted “to” preceding “engage” and “or any penal farm” following “Correction”; and substituted “the board” for “this board” and “subdivisions of this state” for “subdivisions thereof”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and inserted “division”.

12-30-204. Purchase of goods by state and local agencies.

All offices, departments, divisions, institutions, and agencies of this state which are supported in whole or in part by this state, and all political subdivisions of this state, may purchase, at the discretion of the office, department, division, institution, or agency, from the Board of Corrections any products required by the offices, departments, divisions, institutions, agencies, or political subdivisions of this state produced or manufactured by the Division of Correction utilizing prison labor as provided for by this subchapter.

The Revenue Division may request that the board propose the purchase of license plates which are necessary as evidence of registration of motor vehicles and trailers to be issued by the Revenue Division’s revenue offices.

The license plates would be produced or manufactured by the Division of Correction utilizing prison labor.

The provisions of this subdivision (a)(2) shall be applicable beginning with the contracts for purchase or any purchases of license plates which are required after the expiration of any contracts for the purchase or manufacture of license plates that are in effect.

Such offices, departments, divisions, institutions, and agencies shall not be required to submit an invitation for bid to the board for all products known to be produced or manufactured by the Division of Correction utilizing prison labor as provided for by this subchapter.

The Division of Correction may enter into an agreement with the Old State House Commission to utilize inmate labor in the production or manufacture of items for resale by the Old State House Museum.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3) of this section, the proceeds from the sales of the items produced or manufactured under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be used by the Old State House Museum to:

Develop exhibits and programs about the history of the Division of Correction; or

Maintain the Old State House Museum's collection of the Division of Correction artifacts.

The Division of Correction and the commission may by rule modify the use of the proceeds from the sale of items produced or manufactured under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

All purchases made pursuant to this section shall be made through the Division of Correction's purchasing division, upon requisition by the proper authority of the office, department, division, institution, agency, or political subdivision of this state requiring the articles or products.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 1284, § 1, subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) began:

“On and after January 1, 1998,.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted (c), and redesignated the remaining text as (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and similar language, and inserted “divisions” and similar language throughout the section; and substituted “Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration's” for “division's” in (2)(A)(i).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), deleted “also” following “may” and substituted “Department of Correction's Industry Division” for “Department of Correction utilizing prison labor”; and rewrote (b).

The 2009 amendment, in (b)(1), inserted “excluding furniture and seating” in the introductory language, substituted “school districts, and public agencies in this state” for “and agencies of this state which are supported in whole or in part by this state” in (b)(1)(B)(i), and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment, in (b)(1)(B)(i), inserted “public” preceding “offices” and deleted “public” preceding “agencies”.

The 2015 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction's Industry Division” for “Department of Correction's Industry Division” in (a); substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction in (b)(1)(A), and inserted “divisions” in (b)(1)(B)(i); and, in (c), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 982 deleted “upon the condition that the goods may not be resold for profit” following “subchapter” in (a); deleted “excluding furniture and seating” following “subchapter” in the introductory language of (b)(1); substituted “Current employees and retirees of the public offices” for “All employees of the public offices” in (b)(1)(B)(i); substituted “section does not include” for “section shall not include” in (b)(1)(B)(ii); added the (b)(2)(A) designation; added (b)(2)(B); and made stylistic changes.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “with the exception of goods or items produced, assembled, or packaged in whole or in part specifically for sale or reseale to inmates of the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, or a local correctional facility” at the end of (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning needs estimates by state and local agencies, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 944, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1967, No. 473, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-240. For current law, see §12-30-204.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, §§ 4, 5; 1985, No. 825, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-237, 46-238; Acts 1995, No. 944, § 1; 1997, No. 1284, § 1; 2009, No. 307, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 818.

12-30-205. Purchase of goods by nonprofit organizations and other individuals.

A nonprofit organization may purchase goods produced by the Division of Correction's Industry Division as provided for by this subchapter.

(1)Goods produced by the Industry Division as provided for by this subchapter may also be purchased by:

Current employees and retirees of the Division of Correction;

(i)Current employees and retirees of the public offices, departments, divisions, institutions, school districts, and agencies of this state.

Subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section does not include members of the General Assembly; and

Current and former members of the Board of Corrections.

Goods purchased by an individual under subdivision (b)(1) of this section:

Shall be for personal use only and not for resale; and

Exclusive of fees assessed by the Industry Division and applicable taxes, may not exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for any one (1) purchase of home furnishings for any one (1) fiscal year.

Goods or products that are produced, assembled, or packaged in whole or in part by the Division of Correction utilizing prison labor may be sold to inmates of the Division of Correction, Division of Community Correction, or a local correctional facility.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 4; 1985, No. 825, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-237; Acts 1999, No. 1375, § 1; 2005, No. 1182, § 1; 2009, No. 502, § 1; 2011, No. 779, § 24; 2015, No. 1061, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 819; 2019, No. 982, § 1.

12-30-206. Prices.

The Board of Corrections shall fix and determine the prices at which all articles or products manufactured or produced shall be furnished.

The prices shall be uniform and nondiscriminating to all and shall not exceed the wholesale market prices with the exception of goods or items produced, assembled, or packaged in whole or in part specifically for sale or resale to inmates of the Division of Correction, Division of Community Correction, or a local correctional facility.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-242; 2015, No. 1061, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 820.

12-30-207. Catalogues.

The Board of Corrections shall cause to be prepared, at such times as the board may determine, catalogues containing the description of all articles and products manufactured or produced by the board pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

Copies of the catalogue shall be sent by the board to all offices, departments, institutions, and agencies of this state and made accessible to all political subdivisions of this state referred to in §12-30-204.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-240.

12-30-208. [Repealed.]

The articles or products manufactured or produced by prison labor in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter shall be devoted:

First, to fulfilling the requirements of the offices, departments, institutions, and agencies of this state that are supported in whole or in part by this state; and

Second, to supply the political subdivisions of this state with the articles and products.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-241.

12-30-210. Annual report.

The Division of Correction's Industry Division shall make an annual full and detailed report of:

All materials, machinery, or other property procured, the cost of the materials, machinery, or other property procured, and the expenditures made during the last preceding year for production purposes, together with a statement of all materials then on hand to be produced, in process of production, or already produced;

All machinery, fixtures, or other appurtenances for the purpose of carrying out the work of the Industry Division;

The earnings realized during the last preceding fiscal year as the proceeds of the sale of items produced by the Industry Division; and

The Industry Division's current inventory stock price list.

The report shall be verified by the oath of the Director of the Division of Correction and shall be forwarded to the Board of Corrections by the director within ninety (90) days after the end of the last preceding fiscal year.

The board shall review the report described under this section and shall make the report available on the Division of Correction's website.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 821, amended subsection (a) of this section to change “Director of the Department” to “Director of the Division” and subdivision (a)(3) of this section to change “Department” to “Division”. However, Acts 2019, No. 982, § 2, specifically repealed these references.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the introductory language of (a) and (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 982 rewrote the introductory language of (a); in (a)(1), substituted “property procured, the cost of the materials, machinery, or other property procured, and the expenditures” for “property procured, the cost thereof, and the expenditures”, substituted “production” for “manufacturing” and made similar changes, and substituted “already produced” for “manufactured”; substituted “carrying out the work of the division” for “carrying on the labor of the prisoners” in (a)(2); in (a)(3), inserted “fiscal” and substituted “proceeds of the sale of items produced by the division” for “proceeds of the labor of the prisoners at the Department of Correction or penal institutions of this state”; added (a)(4); in (b)(1), substituted “report” for “statement”, substituted “the Director of the Department of Correction” for “the manager or authorities having charge of penal institutions to be just and true”, substituted “the director within ninety (90) days” for “the manager or authorities having charge within thirty (30) days”, and inserted “fiscal”; added (b)(2); and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-243; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 821; 2019, No. 982, § 2.

12-30-211. Rules.

The Board of Corrections shall have power and authority to prepare and promulgate rules which are necessary to give effect to the provisions of this subchapter with respect to matters of administration and procedure respecting them.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-244; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 908.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in the text.

12-30-212. Auditor of State bound by voucher or warrant.

No voucher, certificate, or warrant issued on the Auditor of State by any office, department, institution, or agency shall be questioned by the Auditor of State or by the Treasurer of State on the grounds that this subchapter has not been complied with by the office, department, institution, or agency.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-239.

12-30-213. Intentional violations.

If an intentional violation of this subchapter by any office, department, institution, or agency continues, after notice from the Governor to desist, then the intentional violation shall constitute a malfeasance in office and shall subject the person or persons responsible for this violation to suspension or removal from office.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-239.

12-30-214. Appropriations — Contracts.

Incident to the employment of prisoners as provided in this subchapter, the Board of Corrections is authorized to:

Erect buildings;

Purchase, install, or replace equipment;

Procure tools, supplies, and materials;

Employ personnel; and

Otherwise defray necessary expenses.

To further aid the purposes in subsection (a) of this section, the board is empowered to enter into contracts and agreements with any person or persons upon a self-liquidating basis respecting the acquisition and purchase of any equipment, tools, supplies, and materials to the end that they may be paid for over a period of not exceeding ten (10) years.

The aggregate amount of the purchases or acquisitions are not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) unless specifically approved by the Governor with the amounts to be payable solely out of the revenues derived from the activities authorized by this subchapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to authorize or permit the incurring of a state debt of any kind or nature as contemplated by the Arkansas Constitution in relation to the debt.

The effect of the appropriation in Acts 1977, No. 713, in transferring general revenues to the Prison Industry Account, was to repeal by implication the provision in this section requiring that purchases be payable solely out of revenues derived from the industry since, if two legislative acts relating to the same subject are in conflict with each other, the later act controls. Wells v. Heath, 274 Ark. 45, 622 S.W.2d 163 (1981).

Cited: Wells v. Heath, 269 Ark. 473, 602 S.W.2d 665 (1980).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 473, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-245.

12-30-215. Purchase for construction or operation of prison.

Any contractor or subcontractor who has entered into a contract with or for the benefit of a state board, state agency, or state-supported institution of higher education for constructing, equipping, or operating, in whole or in part, any facility of the board, agency, or institution may purchase goods produced by the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction for use in the performance of the contract.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 877, § 1; 1999, No. 145, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 822.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.

Subchapter 3

— Farms

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1991, No. 343, § 6, provided:

“The Department of Corrections Farm Advisory Board created under Arkansas Code §12-30-302 is abolished”.

Effective Dates. Acts 1933, No. 30, § 38: Feb. 14, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained that the present method of operating the State Penitentiary, penitentiary farms and other state penal institutions, is expensive and cumbersome and that the situation should be remedied as quickly as possible in order to save the taxpayers of Arkansas huge sums of money and to increase the efficiency of the penal institutions, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 46: Mar. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order better to effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a Department of Correction to effectuate such rehabilitation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 1, 1968.”

Acts 1987, No. 953, § 31: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-30-301. Farming and livestock activities.

The Division of Correction shall make maximum utilization of the farm lands of the various institutions of the division through the use of modern agricultural machinery, equipment, and technology in producing crops and livestock for use in feeding prisoners and for sale on the market to produce income for the maintenance and operation of the institutions of the division.

The Director of the Division of Correction, with the approval of the Board of Corrections, shall promulgate necessary rules for the operation of the farming and livestock activities of the various institutions of the division, the employment of personnel, the assignment of inmate labor, and other activities as may be reasonably necessary to accomplish the purposes as provided in this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Department of Correction Farm Advisory Board, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 841, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-254 — 46-257.

Acts 1991, No. 343, § 6, provided:

“The Department of Corrections Farm Advisory Board created under Arkansas Code §12-30-302 is abolished.”

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-219.1; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 909; 2019, No. 910, §
823.

12-30-302. [Repealed.]

It shall be the duty of the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service to cooperate with the Director of the Division of Correction to the end that proper crops may be planted to the best advantage and proper methods of soil treatment may be utilized and proper methods of canning and preserving may be used to the best advantage.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 23; Pope's Dig., § 12690; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-216; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 824.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”.